Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1606 Land component impact fee;
determining the amount of land or fee in lieu. (a) The school land area
requirements for new residential developments in a school impact district shall
be based on recent school site area averages, student generation rates, and the
number of dwelling units in the new residential development.

(b) The following formula shall be used to
determine the total school land area requirement for each individual new
residential development in a school impact district:

Elementary school
student generation rate per single-family unit (x) number of single-family
units (x) recent school site area average for the land area per elementary
school student;

plus (+)

Elementary school
student generation rate per multi-family unit (x) number of multi-family units
(x) recent school site area average for the land area per elementary school
student;

plus (+)

Middle school
student generation rate per single-family unit (x) number of single-family
units (x) recent school site area average for the land area per middle school
student;

plus (+)

Middle school
student generation rate per multi-family unit (x) number of multi-family units
(x) recent school site area average for the land area per middle school
student;

plus (+)

High school
student generation rate per single-family unit (x) number of single-family
units (x) recent school site area average for the land area per high school
student;

plus (+)

High school student
generation rate per multi-family unit (x) number of multi-family units (x)
recent school site area average for the land area per high school student;

equals (=)

Total school land
requirement.

(c) The procedure for determining whether the
dedication of land is required or a payment of a fee in lieu is required for a
new school facility or to satisfy the land component impact fee shall be as
follows:

(1) A new residential development with fifty or more
units shall include a written agreement between the owner or developer of the
property and the department, executed prior to issuance of a building permit,
under which the owner or developer has:

(A) Agreed to designate an area to be
dedicated for one or more schools for the development, subject to approval by
the department; or

(B) Agreed to pay to the department, at a
time specified in the agreement, a fee in lieu of land dedication;

(2) A new residential development with less than
fifty units shall include a written agreement between the owner or the
developer of the property and the department, executed prior to the issuance of
the building permit, under which the owner or developer has agreed to a time
specified for payment for the fee in lieu;

(3) Prior to approval of any change of zoning,
subdivision, or any other approval for a:

(A) Residential development with fifty or
more units; or

(B) Condominium property regime development
of fifty or more units,

the department shall notify the approving agency
of its determination on whether it will require the development to dedicate
land, pay a fee in lieu thereof, or a combination of both for the provision of
new school facilities;

(4) The department's determination to require land
dedication or the payment of a fee in lieu, or a combination of both, shall be
guided by the following criteria:

(A) The topography, geology, access, value,
and location of the land available for dedication;

(B) The size and shape of the land available
for dedication;

(C) The location of existing or proposed
schooling facilities; and

(D) The availability of infrastructure;

(5) The determination of the department as to whether
lands shall be dedicated or whether a fee in lieu shall be paid, or a
combination of both, shall be final;

(6) When land dedication is required, the land shall
be conveyed to the State upon completion of the subdivision improvements and
any offsite infrastructure necessary to serve the land; and

(7) When the payment of a fee in lieu is required,
the fee in lieu shall be paid based on the terms contained in the written
agreement.

(d) In determining the value per acre for any
new residential development, the fee simple value of the land identified for
the new or expanded school facility shall be based on the appraised fair market
value of improved, vacant land, zoned for residential use, and serviced by roads,
utilities, and drainage. An appraiser, licensed pursuant to chapter 466K, who
is selected and paid for by the developer, shall determine the value of the
land. If the department does not agree with the developer's appraisal, the
department may engage another licensed appraiser at its own expense, and
resolve, through negotiation between the two appraisers, a fair market value.
If neither party agrees, the first two appraisers shall select the third
appraiser, with the cost of the third appraisal being shared equally by the
department and the developer, and the third appraisal shall be binding on both
parties.

(e) The developer or owner of new residential
developments of fifty or more units shall either pay the fee in lieu based on
the land value as determined in subsection (d) or convey appropriate acreage as
determined in subsection (b). When conveying the fee simple interest for the
new or expanded school facility, the developers shall be credited the
difference between the fair market fee simple value of the property and the
developers' proportionate share of the value of the land as determined in
subsection (d) against any construction cost component impact fee. Any excess
may be transferred and used as credit against any future land or construction
cost requirements on any other development of the State.

(f) The dollar amount of the fee in lieu shall
be determined using the following formula:

Acres of land subject to the fee in
lieu, as determined under subsection (c) multiplied by the value per acre of
land determined pursuant to subsection (d).

[L 2007, c 245, pt of §2; am L
2010, c 188, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next